Hawaii statutes.
[PART
III. UNCLAIMED PROPERTY]

Revision Note

Part heading added by revisor pursuant to §23G-15.

[§421C-41]
Annual report of unclaimed property. Chapter 523A shall not apply to an
electric utility cooperative association; provided that each association within
one hundred twenty days after the close of the association's fiscal year, shall
file with the director of finance an annual report of unclaimed property in its
possession in a form prescribed by the director of finance; provided further
that the electric utility cooperative association shall remain responsible for
the payment of all claims relating to unclaimed property reported by it to the
director of finance. [L 2005, c 52, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next